nlp/Scripts/tsearch_data_polish/polish.affix
        Y W A Ć                 >       -YWAĆ,UJĄCYMI
        Y W A Ć                 >       -YWAĆ,UJĄCYCH
        Y W A Ć                 >       -YWAĆ,UJĄCEGO
        Y W A Ć                 >       -YWAĆ,UJĄCEMU
        Y W A Ć                 >       -YWAĆ,UJĄCA
        Y W A Ć                 >       -YWAĆ,UJĄCĄ
        Y W A Ć                 >       -YWAĆ,UJĄCE
        Y W A Ć                 >       -YWAĆ,UJĄCEJ

        [^CDR] Z A Ć            >       -ZAĆ,ŻĄCY
        [^CDR] Z A Ć            >       -ZAĆ,ŻĄCYM
        [^CDR] Z A Ć            >       -ZAĆ,ŻĄCYMI
        [^CDR] Z A Ć            >       -ZAĆ,ŻĄCYCH
        [^CDR] Z A Ć            >       -ZAĆ,ŻĄCEGO
        [^CDR] Z A Ć            >       -ZAĆ,ŻĄCEMU
        [^CDR] Z A Ć            >       -ZAĆ,ŻĄCA
        [^CDR] Z A Ć            >       -ZAĆ,ŻĄCĄ
        [^CDR] Z A Ć            >       -ZAĆ,ŻĄCE
        [^CDR] Z A Ć            >       -ZAĆ,ŻĄCEJ

        R Z A Ć                 >       -AĆ,EJĄCY
        R Z A Ć                 >       -AĆ,EJĄCYM
        R Z A Ć                 >       -AĆ,EJĄCYMI
        R Z A Ć                 >       -AĆ,EJĄCYCH
        R Z A Ć                 >       -AĆ,EJĄCEGO
        R Z A Ć                 >       -AĆ,EJĄCEMU
        R Z A Ć                 >       -AĆ,EJĄCA
        R Z A Ć                 >       -AĆ,EJĄCĄ
        R Z A Ć                 >       -AĆ,EJĄCE
        R Z A Ć                 >       -AĆ,EJĄCEJ

#giąć
        G I Ą Ć                 >       -IĄĆ,NĄCY
        G I Ą Ć                 >       -IĄĆ,NĄCYM
        G I Ą Ć                 >       -IĄĆ,NĄCYMI
        G I Ą Ć                 >       -IĄĆ,NĄCYCH
        G I Ą Ć                 >       -IĄĆ,NĄCEGO
        G I Ą Ć                 >       -IĄĆ,NĄCEMU
        G I Ą Ć                 >       -IĄĆ,NĄCA
        G I Ą Ć                 >       -IĄĆ,NĄCĄ
        G I Ą Ć                 >       -IĄĆ,NĄCE
        G I Ą Ć                 >       -IĄĆ,NĄCEJ

#kląć
        L Ą Ć                   >       -ĄĆ,NĄCY
        L Ą Ć                   >       -ĄĆ,NĄCYM
        L Ą Ć                   >       -ĄĆ,NĄCYMI
        L Ą Ć                   >       -ĄĆ,NĄCYCH
        L Ą Ć                   >       -ĄĆ,NĄCEGO
        L Ą Ć                   >       -ĄĆ,NĄCEMU
        L Ą Ć                   >       -ĄĆ,NĄCA
        L Ą Ć                   >       -ĄĆ,NĄCĄ
        L Ą Ć                   >       -ĄĆ,NĄCE
        L Ą Ć                   >       -ĄĆ,NĄCEJ

        S N Ą Ć                 >       -Ć,CY
        S N Ą Ć                 >       -Ć,CYM
        S N Ą Ć                 >       -Ć,CYMI
        S N Ą Ć                 >       -Ć,CYCH
        S N Ą Ć                 >       -Ć,CEGO
        S N Ą Ć                 >       -Ć,CEMU
        S N Ą Ć                 >       -Ć,CA
        S N Ą Ć                 >       -Ć,CĄ
        S N Ą Ć                 >       -Ć,CE
        S N Ą Ć                 >       -Ć,CEJ

        Z N Ą Ć                 >       -Ć,CY
        Z N Ą Ć                 >       -Ć,CYM
        Z N Ą Ć                 >       -Ć,CYMI
        Z N Ą Ć                 >       -Ć,CYCH
        Z N Ą Ć                 >       -Ć,CEGO
        Z N Ą Ć                 >       -Ć,CEMU
        Z N Ą Ć                 >       -Ć,CA
        Z N Ą Ć                 >       -Ć,CĄ
        Z N Ą Ć                 >       -Ć,CE
        Z N Ą Ć                 >       -Ć,CEJ

        D Z I E Ć               >       -IEĆ,ĄCY
        D Z I E Ć               >       -IEĆ,ĄCYM
        D Z I E Ć               >       -IEĆ,ĄCYMI
        D Z I E Ć               >       -IEĆ,ĄCYCH
        D Z I E Ć               >       -IEĆ,ĄCEGO
        D Z I E Ć               >       -IEĆ,ĄCEMU
        D Z I E Ć               >       -IEĆ,ĄCA
        D Z I E Ć               >       -IEĆ,ĄCĄ
        D Z I E Ć               >       -IEĆ,ĄCE
        D Z I E Ć               >       -IEĆ,ĄCEJ

# lecieć
        C I E Ć                 >       -IEĆ,ĄCY
        C I E Ć                 >       -IEĆ,ĄCYM
        C I E Ć                 >       -IEĆ,ĄCYMI
        C I E Ć                 >       -IEĆ,ĄCYCH
        C I E Ć                 >       -IEĆ,ĄCEGO
        C I E Ć                 >       -IEĆ,ĄCEMU
        C I E Ć                 >       -IEĆ,ĄCA
        C I E Ć                 >       -IEĆ,ĄCĄ
        C I E Ć                 >       -IEĆ,ĄCE
        C I E Ć                 >       -IEĆ,ĄCEJ

        N I E Ć                 >       -IEĆ,ĄCY
        N I E Ć                 >       -IEĆ,ĄCYM
        N I E Ć                 >       -IEĆ,ĄCYMI
        N I E Ć                 >       -IEĆ,ĄCYCH
        N I E Ć                 >       -IEĆ,ĄCEGO
        N I E Ć                 >       -IEĆ,ĄCEMU
        N I E Ć                 >       -IEĆ,ĄCA
        N I E Ć                 >       -IEĆ,ĄCĄ
        N I E Ć                 >       -IEĆ,ĄCE
        N I E Ć                 >       -IEĆ,ĄCEJ

        [MP] I E Ć              >       -EĆ,ĄCY
        [MP] I E Ć              >       -EĆ,ĄCYM
        [MP] I E Ć              >       -EĆ,ĄCYMI
        [MP] I E Ć              >       -EĆ,ĄCYCH
        [MP] I E Ć              >       -EĆ,ĄCEGO
        [MP] I E Ć              >       -EĆ,ĄCEMU
        [MP] I E Ć              >       -EĆ,ĄCA
        [MP] I E Ć              >       -EĆ,ĄCĄ
        [MP] I E Ć              >       -EĆ,ĄCE
        [MP] I E Ć              >       -EĆ,ĄCEJ

        S I E Ć                 >       -IEĆ,ZĄCY
        S I E Ć                 >       -IEĆ,ZĄCYM
        S I E Ć                 >       -IEĆ,ZĄCYMI
        S I E Ć                 >       -IEĆ,ZĄCYCH
        S I E Ć                 >       -IEĆ,ZĄCEGO
        S I E Ć                 >       -IEĆ,ZĄCEMU
        S I E Ć                 >       -IEĆ,ZĄCA
        S I E Ć                 >       -IEĆ,ZĄCĄ
        S I E Ć                 >       -IEĆ,ZĄCE
        S I E Ć                 >       -IEĆ,ZĄCEJ

        L E Ć                   >       -EĆ,ĄCY
        L E Ć                   >       -EĆ,ĄCYM
        L E Ć                   >       -EĆ,ĄCYMI
        L E Ć                   >       -EĆ,ĄCYCH
        L E Ć                   >       -EĆ,ĄCEGO
        L E Ć                   >       -EĆ,ĄCEMU
        L E Ć                   >       -EĆ,ĄCA
        L E Ć                   >       -EĆ,ĄCĄ
        L E Ć                   >       -EĆ,ĄCE
        L E Ć                   >       -EĆ,ĄCEJ

	[AO] R Z E Ć            >       -Ć,JĄCY
	[AO] R Z E Ć            >       -Ć,JĄCYM
	[AO] R Z E Ć            >       -Ć,JĄCYMI
	[AO] R Z E Ć            >       -Ć,JĄCYCH
	[AO] R Z E Ć            >       -Ć,JĄCEGO
	[AO] R Z E Ć            >       -Ć,JĄCEMU
	[AO] R Z E Ć            >       -Ć,JĄCA
	[AO] R Z E Ć            >       -Ć,JĄCĄ
	[AO] R Z E Ć            >       -Ć,JĄCE
	[AO] R Z E Ć            >       -Ć,JĄCEJ

        [^AO] R Z E Ć           >       -ZEĆ,ĄCY
        [^AO] R Z E Ć           >       -ZEĆ,ĄCYM
        [^AO] R Z E Ć           >       -ZEĆ,ĄCYMI
        [^AO] R Z E Ć           >       -ZEĆ,ĄCYCH
        [^AO] R Z E Ć           >       -ZEĆ,ĄCEGO
        [^AO] R Z E Ć           >       -ZEĆ,ĄCEMU
        [^AO] R Z E Ć           >       -ZEĆ,ĄCA
        [^AO] R Z E Ć           >       -ZEĆ,ĄCĄ
        [^AO] R Z E Ć           >       -ZEĆ,ĄCE
        [^AO] R Z E Ć           >       -ZEĆ,ĄCEJ

        [BFMNPW] I Ć            >       -Ć,JĄCY
        [BFMNPW] I Ć            >       -Ć,JĄCYM
        [BFMNPW] I Ć            >       -Ć,JĄCYMI
        [BFMNPW] I Ć            >       -Ć,JĄCYCH
        [BFMNPW] I Ć            >       -Ć,JĄCEGO
        [BFMNPW] I Ć            >       -Ć,JĄCEMU
        [BFMNPW] I Ć            >       -Ć,JĄCA
        [BFMNPW] I Ć            >       -Ć,JĄCĄ
        [BFMNPW] I Ć            >       -Ć,JĄCE
        [BFMNPW] I Ć            >       -Ć,JĄCEJ

# trząść
        Ą Ś Ć                   >       -ĄŚĆ,ĘSĄCY
        Ą Ś Ć                   >       -ĄŚĆ,ĘSĄCYM
        Ą Ś Ć                   >       -ĄŚĆ,ĘSĄCYMI
        Ą Ś Ć                   >       -ĄŚĆ,ĘSĄCYCH
        Ą Ś Ć                   >       -ĄŚĆ,ĘSĄCEGO
        Ą Ś Ć                   >       -ĄŚĆ,ĘSĄCEMU
        Ą Ś Ć                   >       -ĄŚĆ,ĘSĄCA
        Ą Ś Ć                   >       -ĄŚĆ,ĘSĄCĄ
        Ą Ś Ć                   >       -ĄŚĆ,ĘSĄCE
        Ą Ś Ć                   >       -ĄŚĆ,ĘSĄCEJ

# nieść
        [^J] E Ś Ć              >       -EŚĆ,OSĄCY
        [^J] E Ś Ć              >       -EŚĆ,OSĄCYM
        [^J] E Ś Ć              >       -EŚĆ,OSĄCYMI
        [^J] E Ś Ć              >       -EŚĆ,OSĄCYCH
        [^J] E Ś Ć              >       -EŚĆ,OSĄCEGO
        [^J] E Ś Ć              >       -EŚĆ,OSĄCEMU
        [^J] E Ś Ć              >       -EŚĆ,OSĄCA
        [^J] E Ś Ć              >       -EŚĆ,OSĄCĄ
        [^J] E Ś Ć              >       -EŚĆ,OSĄCE
        [^J] E Ś Ć              >       -EŚĆ,OSĄCEJ

# bóść
        Ó Ś Ć                   >       -ÓŚĆ,ODĄCY
        Ó Ś Ć                   >       -ÓŚĆ,ODĄCYM
        Ó Ś Ć                   >       -ÓŚĆ,ODĄCYMI
        Ó Ś Ć                   >       -ÓŚĆ,ODĄCYCH
        Ó Ś Ć                   >       -ÓŚĆ,ODĄCEGO
        Ó Ś Ć                   >       -ÓŚĆ,ODĄCEMU
        Ó Ś Ć                   >       -ÓŚĆ,ODĄCA
        Ó Ś Ć                   >       -ÓŚĆ,ODĄCĄ
        Ó Ś Ć                   >       -ÓŚĆ,ODĄCE
        Ó Ś Ć                   >       -ÓŚĆ,ODĄCEJ

        [UY] Ć                  >       -Ć,JĄCY
        [UY] Ć                  >       -Ć,JĄCYM
        [UY] Ć                  >       -Ć,JĄCYMI
        [UY] Ć                  >       -Ć,JĄCYCH
        [UY] Ć                  >       -Ć,JĄCEGO
        [UY] Ć                  >       -Ć,JĄCEMU
        [UY] Ć                  >       -Ć,JĄCA
        [UY] Ć                  >       -Ć,JĄCĄ
        [UY] Ć                  >       -Ć,JĄCE
        [UY] Ć                  >       -Ć,JĄCEJ

# kłuć
        K Ł U Ć                 >       -ŁUĆ,OLĄCY
        K Ł U Ć                 >       -ŁUĆ,OLĄCYM
        K Ł U Ć                 >       -ŁUĆ,OLĄCYMI
        K Ł U Ć                 >       -ŁUĆ,OLĄCYCH
        K Ł U Ć                 >       -ŁUĆ,OLĄCEGO
        K Ł U Ć                 >       -ŁUĆ,OLĄCEMU
        K Ł U Ć                 >       -ŁUĆ,OLĄCA
        K Ł U Ć                 >       -ŁUĆ,OLĄCĄ
        K Ł U Ć                 >       -ŁUĆ,OLĄCE
        K Ł U Ć                 >       -ŁUĆ,OLĄCEJ

        [^E] Ź Ć                >       -ŹĆ,ZĄCY
        [^E] Ź Ć                >       -ŹĆ,ZĄCYM
        [^E] Ź Ć                >       -ŹĆ,ZĄCYMI
        [^E] Ź Ć                >       -ŹĆ,ZĄCYCH
        [^E] Ź Ć                >       -ŹĆ,ZĄCEGO
        [^E] Ź Ć                >       -ŹĆ,ZĄCEMU
        [^E] Ź Ć                >       -ŹĆ,ZĄCA
        [^E] Ź Ć                >       -ŹĆ,ZĄCĄ
        [^E] Ź Ć                >       -ŹĆ,ZĄCE
        [^E] Ź Ć                >       -ŹĆ,ZĄCEJ

        I E Ź Ć                 >       -EŹĆ,OZĄCY
        I E Ź Ć                 >       -EŹĆ,OZĄCYM
        I E Ź Ć                 >       -EŹĆ,OZĄCYMI
        I E Ź Ć                 >       -EŹĆ,OZĄCYCH
        I E Ź Ć                 >       -EŹĆ,OZĄCEGO
        I E Ź Ć                 >       -EŹĆ,OZĄCEMU
        I E Ź Ć                 >       -EŹĆ,OZĄCA
        I E Ź Ć                 >       -EŹĆ,OZĄCĄ
        I E Ź Ć                 >       -EŹĆ,OZĄCE
        I E Ź Ć                 >       -EŹĆ,OZĄCEJ

#leźć
        L E Ź Ć                 >       -ŹĆ,ZĄCY
        L E Ź Ć                 >       -ŹĆ,ZĄCYM
        L E Ź Ć                 >       -ŹĆ,ZĄCYMI
        L E Ź Ć                 >       -ŹĆ,ZĄCYCH
        L E Ź Ć                 >       -ŹĆ,ZĄCEGO
        L E Ź Ć                 >       -ŹĆ,ZĄCEMU
        L E Ź Ć                 >       -ŹĆ,ZĄCA
        L E Ź Ć                 >       -ŹĆ,ZĄCĄ
        L E Ź Ć                 >       -ŹĆ,ZĄCE
        L E Ź Ć                 >       -ŹĆ,ZĄCEJ
